District of Columbia statutes.
32-807

Director of Industrial Safety.

The Board is hereby authorized to employ a Director of Industrial Safety, who shall not be a member of the Board. The Director shall perform such duties as may be prescribed by the Board in administering the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 19, 1918, ch. 174, title II, § 7
Oct. 14, 1941, 55 Stat. 738, ch. 438,§ 3
Oct. 28, 1949, 63 Stat. 972, ch. 782, title XI, § 1106(a)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(k), 25 DCR 5740
Repeal of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 32-801.
1973 Ed., § 36-437.
1981 Ed., § 36-227.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.